Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1061
Licensure; categories; use of titles prohibited; practice in licensed establishment or facility.

(1) All practitioners shall be licensed by the department under the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act in a category or categories appropriate to their practice.

(2) Licensure shall be required before any person may engage in the full, unsupervised practice or teaching of cosmetology, electrology, esthetics, nail technology, or body art, and no person may assume the title of cosmetologist, electrologist, esthetician, instructor, nail technician, nail technology instructor, esthetics instructor, permanent color technician, tattoo artist, body piercer, or body brander without first being licensed by the department.

(3) All licensed practitioners shall practice in an appropriate licensed establishment or facility.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 47;

Laws 1995, LB 83, § 21;

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 27;

Laws 2002, LB 241, § 22;

Laws 2004, LB 906, § 19;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-386;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 323;

Laws 2018, LB731, § 15.